Ohio, session 136, HB953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. All items in this act are hereby appropriated as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 1 2 3 4 5 A COM DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group C 5FW0 800616 Financial Literacy Education $250,000 $250,000 D Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $250,000 $250,000 E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $250,000 $250,000 FINANCIAL LITERACY EDUCATION The foregoing appropriation item 800616, Financial Literacy Education, shall be used to support Junior Achievement of Northwestern Ohio's fifth year program. Section 2. Within the limits set forth in this act, the Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from operating appropriations contained in this act shall be accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all applicable provisions of, H.B. 96 of the 136th General Assembly.